Connecticut, session 2026, SB00381.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Each public institution of
2 higher education in the state shall provide an on-campus program
3 concerning problem gambling at least once each academic year. Such
4 program shall include, but need not be limited to, information about any
5 on-campus and community resources available for the treatment and
6 rehabilitation of problem gambling. Any institution may contract with
7 a nonprofit organization to provide such program at such institution.
8 Each institution that enters into such a contract shall give priority to any
9 nonprofit organization receiving funds pursuant to section 17a-713 of
10 the general statutes. As used in this section, "problem gambling" means
11 when an individual engages in compulsive gambling or has an
12 uncontrollable urge to keep gambling despite any negative impact on
13 such individual's life.
SB381 / File No. 158 1

SB381 File No. 158
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
HED Joint Favorable
SB381 / File No. 158 2

SB381 File No. 158
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Constituent Units of Higher OF - Cost Potential Potential
Education
Note: OF= Other Funds
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a potential cost annually beginning in FY 27 to the
constituent units of higher education. It requires each public institution
of higher education to conduct one on-campus program concerning
problem gambling each year.
The per campus cost of one problem gambling program can vary
significantly depending on the program's itinerary. Cost associated with
educational materials, event space and technology, speaker fees, and
food and refreshments could be up to $10,000. At $5,000 per campus: (1)
at UConn, this results in an annual cost of $25,000 across Storrs and the
four regional campuses; and (2) at the Connecticut State Colleges and
Universities, this results in an annual cost of $80,000 across the four state
universities and 12 CT State campuses.
The bill allows UConn and CSCU to each contract with a nonprofit to
conduct problem gambling programming. If the contract requires the
nonprofit to cover all, or a portion of, the program cost, the above stated
cost could be significantly reduced or eliminated.
The Out Years
SB381 / File No. 158 3

SB381 File No. 158
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the cost of problem gambling
programs, and the provisions of contracts the constituent units of higher
education enter into with nonprofits.
SB381 / File No. 158 4

SB381 File No. 158
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 381
AN ACT REQUIRING PROGRAMS CONCERNING PROBLEM
GAMBLING AT PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION.